Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.740

Retirement or termination agreement payments—Opportunity to change payment options.

Members of the teachers' retirement system who retired prior to January 1, 1993, from service with a community college district whose reported earnable compensation included payments made pursuant to an agreement to terminate or retire, or to provide notice of intent to retire, and whose retirement allowance has been reduced under RCW 41.50.150 or is reduced after July 25, 1993, under RCW 41.50.730, shall have an opportunity to change the retirement allowance payment option selected by the member under RCW 41.32.530. Any request for a change shall be made in writing to the department no later than October 31, 1993, and shall apply prospectively only.

[ 1993 c 270 s 2.]